Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 2.3. Stormwater Management Act.
§ 62.1-44.15:27.
(For effective date, see Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345) Virginia Programs for Erosion Control and Stormwater Management.

Any locality that operates a regulated MS4 or that administers a Virginia Stormwater Management Program (VSMP) as of July 1, 2017, shall be required to adopt and administer a VESMP consistent with the provisions of this article that regulates any land-disturbing activity that (i) disturbs 10,000 square feet or more or (ii) disturbs 2,500 square feet or more in an area of a locality designated as a Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.). The VESMP shall be adopted according to a process established by the Department.

Any locality that does not operate a regulated MS4 and for which the Department administers a VSMP as of July 1, 2017, shall choose one of the following options and shall notify the Department of its choice according to a process established by the Department:

Adopt and administer a VESMP consistent with the provisions of this article that regulates any land-disturbing activity that (i) disturbs 10,000 square feet or more or (ii) disturbs 2,500 square feet or more in an area of a locality designated as a Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.);

Adopt and administer a VESMP consistent with the provisions of this article that regulates any land-disturbing activity that (i) disturbs 10,000 square feet or more or (ii) disturbs 2,500 square feet or more in an area of a locality designated as a Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.), except that the Department shall provide the locality with review of the plan required by §

62.1-44.15:34

and provide a recommendation to the locality on the plan’s compliance with the water quality and water quantity technical criteria; or

Adopt and administer a VESCP pursuant to Article 2.4 (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.) that regulates any land-disturbing activity that (i) disturbs 10,000 square feet or more or (ii) disturbs 2,500 square feet or more in an area of a locality designated as a Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§ 62.1-44.15:67 et seq.). For such a land-disturbing activity in a Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area, the VESCP authority also shall adopt requirements set forth in this article and attendant regulations as required to regulate those activities in accordance with §§

62.1-44.15:28

and

62.1-44.15:34

.

The Board shall administer a VSMP on behalf of each VESCP authority for any land-disturbing activity that (a) disturbs one acre or more of land or (b) disturbs less than one acre of land and is part of a larger common plan of development or sale that results in one acre or greater of land disturbance.

Any town that is required to or elects to adopt and administer a VESMP or VESCP, as applicable, may choose one of the following options and shall notify the Department of its choice according to a process established by the Department:

Any town, including a town that operates a regulated MS4, lying within a county may enter into an agreement with the county to become subject to the county’s VESMP. If a town lies within the boundaries of more than one county, it may enter into an agreement with any of those counties that operates a VESMP.

Any town that chooses not to adopt and administer a VESMP pursuant to subdivision B 3 and that lies within a county may enter into an agreement with the county to become subject to the county’s VESMP or VESCP, as applicable. If a town lies within the boundaries of more than one county, it may enter into an agreement with any of those counties.

Any town that is subject to the provisions of the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) may enter into an agreement with a county pursuant to subdivision C 1 or 2 only if the county administers a VESMP for land-disturbing activities that disturb 2,500 square feet or more.

Any locality that chooses not to implement a VESMP pursuant to subdivision B 3 may notify the Department at any time that it has chosen to implement a VESMP pursuant to subdivision B 1 or 2. Any locality that chooses to implement a VESMP pursuant to subdivision B 2 may notify the Department at any time that it has chosen to implement a VESMP pursuant to subdivision B 1. A locality may petition the Board at any time for approval to change from fully administering a VESMP pursuant to subdivision B 1 to administering a VESMP in coordination with the Department pursuant to subdivision B 2 due to a significant change in economic conditions or other fiscal emergency in the locality. The provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) shall govern any appeal of the Board’s decision.

To comply with the water quantity technical criteria set forth in this article and attendant regulations for land-disturbing activities that disturb an area of 2,500 square feet or more but less than one acre, any rural Tidewater locality may adopt a tiered approach to water quantity management pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:27.2

.

In support of VESMP authorities, the Department shall provide technical assistance and training and general assistance to localities in the establishment and administration of their individual or regional programs.

The Department shall develop a model ordinance for establishing a VESMP consistent with this article.

Each locality that operates a regulated MS4 or that chooses to administer a VESMP shall, by ordinance, establish a VESMP that shall be administered in conjunction with a local MS4 management program, if applicable, and which shall include the following:

Ordinances, policies, and technical materials consistent with regulations adopted in accordance with this article;

Requirements for land-disturbance approvals;

Requirements for plan review, inspection, and enforcement consistent with the requirements of this article, including provisions requiring periodic inspections of the installation of stormwater management measures. A VESMP authority may require monitoring and reports from the person responsible for meeting the permit conditions to ensure compliance with the permit and to determine whether the measures required in the permit provide effective stormwater management;

Provisions charging each applicant a reasonable fee to defray the cost of program administration for a regulated land-disturbing activity that does not require permit coverage. Such fee may be in addition to any fee charged pursuant to the statewide fee schedule established in accordance with subdivision 9 of §

62.1-44.15:28

, although payment of fees may be consolidated in order to provide greater convenience and efficiency for those responsible for compliance with the program. A VESMP authority shall hold a public hearing prior to establishing such fees. The fee shall not exceed an amount commensurate with the services rendered, taking into consideration the time, skill, and the VESMP authority’s expense involved;

Provisions for long-term responsibility for and maintenance of stormwater management control devices and other techniques specified to manage the quality and quantity of runoff; and

Provisions for the coordination of the VESMP with flood insurance, flood plain management, and other programs requiring compliance prior to authorizing land disturbance in order to make the submission and approval of plans, issuance of land-disturbance approvals, payment of fees, and coordination of inspection and enforcement activities more convenient and efficient both for the local governments and those responsible for compliance with the programs.

The Board shall approve a VESMP when it deems a program consistent with this article and associated regulations.

A VESMP authority may enter into agreements or contracts with the Department, soil and water conservation districts, adjacent localities, planning district commissions, or other public or private entities to carry out or assist with plan review and inspections. A VESMP authority may enter into contracts with third-party professionals who hold certifications in the appropriate subject areas, as provided in subsection A of §

62.1-44.15:30

, to carry out any or all of the responsibilities that this article requires of a VESMP authority, including plan review and inspection but not including enforcement.

A VESMP authority shall be required to obtain evidence of permit coverage from the Department’s online reporting system, where such coverage is required, prior to providing land-disturbance approval.

The VESMP authority responsible for regulating the land-disturbing activity shall require compliance with its applicable ordinances and the conditions of its land-disturbance approval and plan specifications. The Board shall enforce permits and require compliance with its applicable regulations, including when serving as a VSMP authority in a locality that chose not to adopt a VESMP in accordance with subdivision B 3.

In the case of a land-disturbing activity located on property controlled by a regional industrial facility authority established pursuant to Chapter 64 (§

15.2-6400

et seq.) of Title 15.2, if a participating local member of such an authority also administers a VESMP, such locality shall be authorized to administer the VESMP on authority property, in accordance with an agreement entered into with all relevant localities and the existing VSMP or VESMP for the property.

History.

1989, cc. 467, 499, § 10.1-603.3; 2004, c. 372; 2006, c. 171; 2009, c. 18; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2014, cc. 303, 598; 2016, cc. 68, 758; 2017, c. 349; 2018, c. 154; contingently amended by 2022, c. 160.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:27

.

§ 62.1-44.15:27.1.
(For effective date — see notes) Virginia Stormwater Management Programs administered by the Board.

The Board shall administer a Virginia Stormwater Management Program (VSMP) on behalf of any locality that notifies the Department pursuant to subsection B of §

62.1-44.15:27

that it has chosen to not administer a VESMP as provided by subdivision B 3 of §

62.1-44.15:27

. In such a locality:

The Board shall implement a VSMP in order to manage the quality and quantity of stormwater runoff resulting from any land-disturbing activity that (i) disturbs one acre or more of land or (ii) disturbs less than one acre of land and is part of a larger common plan of development or sale that results in one acre or greater of land disturbance, as required by this article.

No person shall conduct a land-disturbing activity until he has obtained land-disturbance approval from the VESCP authority and, if required, submitted to the Department an application that includes a permit registration statement and stormwater management plan, and the Department has issued permit coverage.

The Board shall adopt regulations establishing specifications for the VSMP, including permit requirements and requirements for plan review, inspection, and enforcement that reflect the analogous stormwater management requirements for a VESMP set forth in applicable provisions of this article.

History.

2016, cc. 68, 758.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

§ 62.1-44.15:27.2.
Rural Tidewater localities; water quantity technical criteria; tiered approach.

For determining the water quantity technical criteria applicable to a land disturbance equal to or greater than 2,500 square feet but less than one acre, any rural Tidewater locality may elect to use certain tiered water quantity control standards based on the percentage of impervious cover in the watershed as provided in this section. The establishment and conduct of the tiered approach by the locality pursuant to this section shall be subject to review by the Department. The Board shall adopt regulations to carry out provisions of this section.

The local governing body shall make, or cause to be made, a watershed map showing the boundaries of the locality. The governing body shall use the most recent version of Virginia’s 6th order National Watershed Boundary Dataset to show the boundaries of each watershed located partially or wholly within the locality. The map shall indicate the percentage of impervious cover within each watershed. Data provided by the Virginia Geographic Information Network (VGIN) shall be sufficient for the initial determination of impervious cover percentage at the time of the initial adoption of the map.
B. 1. The local governing body shall make, or cause to be made, a watershed map showing the boundaries of the locality. The governing body shall use the most recent version of Virginia’s 6th order National Watershed Boundary Dataset to show the boundaries of each watershed located partially or wholly within the locality. The map shall indicate the percentage of impervious cover within each watershed. Data provided by the Virginia Geographic Information Network (VGIN) shall be sufficient for the initial determination of impervious cover percentage at the time of the initial adoption of the map.

The watershed map also shall show locations at which the governing body expects or proposes that development should occur and may indicate the projected future percentage of impervious cover based on proposed development. The governing body may designate certain areas within a watershed in which it proposes that denser-than-average development shall occur and may designate environmentally sensitive areas in which the energy balance method for water quantity management, as set forth in the regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to this article, shall apply.

After the watershed map has been made, the governing body may then approve and adopt the map by a majority vote of its membership and publish it as the official watershed map of the locality. No official watershed map shall be adopted by the governing body or have any effect until it is approved by an ordinance duly passed by the governing body of the locality after a public hearing, preceded by public notice as required by §

15.2-2204

. Within 30 days after adoption of the official watershed map, the governing body shall cause the map to be filed in the office of the clerk of the circuit court.

At least once each year, the local governing body shall by majority vote make additions to or modifications of the official watershed map to reflect actual development projects. The governing body shall change the indication on the map of the impervious cover percentage within a watershed where the percentage has changed and shall update the map and supporting datasets with actual development project information, including single-family housing projects and any projects covered by the General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities and administered by the Department for opt-out localities pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:27

. The governing body may incorporate into the official watershed map the most recent VGIN data, including data on state and federal projects that are not reviewed or approved by the locality. The governing body shall keep current its impervious cover percentage for each watershed located within the locality, as reflected in the official watershed map, and shall make the map and such percentages available to the public.

The locality shall notify the Department and update the official map within 12 months of the approval of the development plan for any project that exceeds the impervious cover percentage of the watershed in which it is located and causes the percentage for that watershed to rise such that the watershed steps up to the next higher tier pursuant to subsection C.

No official watershed map or its adopting or amending ordinances shall take precedence over any duly adopted zoning ordinance, comprehensive plan, or other local land-use ordinance, and in the case of a conflict, the official watershed map or ordinance shall yield to such land-use ordinance.

When the locality evaluates any development project in a watershed that is depicted on the official watershed map as having an impervious cover percentage of:

Less than five percent, the locality shall apply the regulatory minimum standards and criteria adopted by the Board pursuant to Article 2.4 (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.) and in effect prior to July 1, 2014, for the protection of downstream properties and waterways from sediment deposition, erosion, and damage due to increases in volume, velocity, and peak flow rate of stormwater runoff for the stated frequency storm of 24-hour duration.

Five percent or more but less than 7.5 percent, the locality shall require practices designed to detain and release over a 24-hour period the expected rainfall resulting from the one year, 24-hour storm, which practices shall be exempt from any flow rate capacity and velocity requirements for natural or man-made channels.

Seven and one-half percent or more, the locality shall apply the energy balance method as set forth in regulations adopted by the Board.

The locality shall require that any project whose construction would cause the impervious cover percentage of the watershed in which it is located to rise, such that the watershed steps up to the next higher tier, shall meet the current water quantity technical criteria using the energy balance method or a more stringent alternative.

History.

2018, c. 154.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 154, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Environmental Quality shall utilize an appropriate new or existing Regulatory Advisory Panel to assist in clarifying the interpretation and application of subdivision 19 of 9VAC25-840-40 (Minimum Standard 19).”

§ 62.1-44.15:27.3.
Acceptance of signed and sealed plan in lieu of local plan review.

Any rural Tidewater locality, whether or not it administers a VSMP or VESCP pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:27

, may require that a licensed professional retained by the applicant prepare and submit a set of plans and supporting calculations for a land-disturbing activity of 2,500 square feet or more but less than one acre in extent.

Such professional shall be licensed to engage in practice in the Commonwealth under Chapter 4 (§

54.1-400

et seq.) or 22 (§

54.1-2200

et seq.) of Title 54.1 and shall hold a certificate of competence in the appropriate subject area, as provided in §

62.1-44.15:30

.

Such plans and supporting calculations shall be appropriately signed and sealed by the professional with a certification that states: “This plan is designed in accordance with applicable state law and regulations.”

The rural Tidewater locality is authorized to accept such signed and sealed plans in satisfaction of the requirement of this article that, for a land-disturbing activity of 2,500 square feet or more but less than one acre in extent, it retain a local certified plan reviewer or conduct a local plan review. This section shall not excuse any applicable performance bond requirement pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:34

or

62.1-44.15:57

.

History.

2018, c. 155.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2018 act having been §

62.1-44.15:27.2

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 155, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Environmental Quality shall examine the possibility of expanding the use of the agreement in lieu of a stormwater management plan, as defined in §

62.1-44.15:24

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and as authorized for use in the construction of certain single-family residences by the State Water Control Law (§

62.1-44.2

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), to include any nonresidential development site of less than one acre in any rural Tidewater locality, as defined in §

62.1-44.15:24

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act.”

§ 62.1-44.15:27.4.
Department acceptance of plans in lieu of plan review.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the Board, when administering a VSMP or VESMP pursuant to Article 2.3 (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.), may choose to accept a set of plans and supporting calculations for any land-disturbing activity determined to be de minimis using a risk-based approach established by the Board.

The Board is authorized to accept such plans and supporting calculations in satisfaction of the requirement of this article that it retain a certified plan reviewer or conduct a plan review. This section shall not excuse any applicable performance bond requirement pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:34

or §

62.1-44.15:57

.

History.

2020, c. 812.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “de minimis” was substituted for “de minimus” in subsection A.

Acts 2020, c. 812, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of §§

62.1-44.15:27.4

and

62.1-44.15:56.1

of the Code of Virginia as created by this act. The initial adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia. However, the Board shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholder advisory group, (iii) provide a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”